fi: Kristallijärjestelmä: Kuutio; Kuusikulmainen; Monoklininen; Ortorombinen; Tetragonaalinen; Trikliininen; Trigonaalinen; Muu
pt-BR: Sistema de cristal: Cúbico; Hexagonal; Monoclínico; Ortorrômbico; Tetragonal; Triclínico; Trigonal; Outro
sk-SK: Štruktúra kryštálu: Kubický; Šesťhranný; Monoklinický; Ortorombický; Tetragonálny; Triklinický; Trigonálny; Iné
cs: Krystalografická soustava: Kubická; Šestiúhelník; Monoklinická; Ortorombická; Tetragonální; Triklinická; Trigonální; Jiné
tr: Kristal Sistemi: Kübik; Altıgen şeklinde; Monoklinik; Ortorombik; Dörtgen; Triklinik; Üçgen; Diğer
es: Sistema cristalino: Cúbico; Hexagonal; Monoclínico; Ortorrómbico; Tetragonal; Triclínico; Trigonal; Otros
lt-LT: Kristalinė struktūra: Kubinis; Šešiakampis; Monoklininis; Ortorombinis; Keturkampis; Triklininis; Trikampis; Kita
fr: Système de cristaux: Cubique; Hexagonal; Monoclinique; Orthorhombic; Tetragonal; Triclinique; Trigonal; Autre
zh-CN: 晶系: 立方晶系; 六角形; 单斜晶系; 斜方晶系; 四方晶系; 三斜晶系; 三角晶系; 其他
it: Sistema cristallino: Cubico; Esagonale; Monoclino; Ortorombico; Tetragonale; Triclinico; Trigonale; Altro
nl: Kristalsysteem: Kubus; Zeshoekig; Monoklinisch; Orthorhombisch; Tetragonaal; Triklinisch; Trigonaal; Andere
th: ระบบคริสตัล: คิวบิก; แบบหกเหลี่ยม; โมโนคลินิก; ออร์โธรอมบิก; เตตร้าโกนอล; ไตรคลินิก; ไตรโกนอล; อื่นๆ
de: Kristallsystem: Kubisch; Sechseckig; Monoklin; Orthorhombisch; Tetragonal; Triklinisch; Trigonal; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 晶體系統: 立方體; 六角形; 單斜晶系; 斜方晶系; 四方晶系; 三斜; 三角形; 其他
el: Σύστημα κρυστάλλου: Κυβικός; Εξαγώνιος; Μονοκλινικός; Ορθορομβικός; Τετράγωνος; Τρικλινικός; Τριγωνικός; Άλλο
hr-HR: Kristalni sustav: Kubični; Heksagonski; Monoklinski; Ortorompski; Tetragonalni; Triklinski; Trigonski; Ostalo
pt-PT: Sistema cristalino: Cúbico; Hexagonal; Monoclínico; Ortorrômbico; Tetragonal; Triclínico; Trigonal; Outro
nb: Krystallsystem: Kubisk; Heksagonal; Monoklinisk; Ortorhombisk; Tetragonal; Triclinic; Trigonal; Annet
sl-SI: Kristalni sistem: Kubični; Šesterokotni; Monoklinski; Ortorombični; Tetragonalni; Triklinični; Trigonalni; Drugo
pl: Układ krystalograficzny: Sześcienny; Sześciokątna; Jednoskośny; Ortorombowy; Tetragonalny; Trójskośny; Trygonalny; Inne
vi: Hệ tinh thể: Lập phương; Lục phương; Đơn nghiêng; Trực thoi; Tứ phương; Ba nghiêng; Tam phương; Khác
hu: Kristályrendszer: Kocka alakú; Hatszögletű; Monoklin; Orthorombikus; Négyszögű; Triklinikus; Trigonális; Egyéb
ru: Кристаллическая система: Cubic; Шестиугольный; Моноклинный; Орторомбический; Тетрагональный; Триклинный; Треугольный; Другой
ja: 結晶系: 立方体; 六角; 単斜晶; 斜方晶系; 正方晶系; 三斜晶系; 三斜; その他
da: Krystalsystem: Kubisk; Hexagonal; Monoklinisk; Ortorhombisk; Tetragonal; Triklinisk; Trigonal; Andet
ro-RO: Sistem cristal: Cubic; Hexagonal; Monoclinic; Ortorombic; Tetragonal; Triclinic; Trigonal; Altele
sv: Kristallsystem: Kubisk; Hexagonal; Monoklinisk; Orthorhombic; Tetragonal; Triklinisk; Trigonal; Övrigt
en: Crystal system: Cubic; Hexagonal; Monoclinic; Orthorhombic; Tetragonal; Triclinic; Trigonal; Other
ko: 결정계: 등축정계; 육방정계; 단사정계; 사방정계; 정방정계; 삼사정계; 삼방정계; 기타
bg-BG: Система за кристали: Кубична; Шестоъгълна; Моноклинна; Орторомбична; Тетрагонална; Триклинична; Тригонална; Други